Illinois, session 104th, HB1417.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act is 5amended by changing Section 14 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 5/14)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7614)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 14. Fees; returned checks. The fees for 9administration and enforcement of this Act, including but not 10limited to original licensure, renewal, and restoration shall 11be set by rule. The fees shall be non-refundable. The fee for 12original licensure as an athletic trainer shall not exceed 13$100. The fee for renewal of licensure as an athletic trainer 14shall be calculated at a rate not to exceed $50 per year. The 15total fees required by the Department to enter the profession 16shall not exceed double the original license fee. 17    Any person who delivers a check or other payment to the 18Department that is returned to the Department unpaid by the 19financial institution upon which it is drawn shall pay to the 20Department, in addition to the amount already owed to the 21Department, a fine of $50.22    The fines imposed by this Section are in addition to any 23other discipline provided under this Act for unlicensed   HB1417- 2 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1practice or practice on a nonrenewed license. The Department 2shall notify the person that payment of fees and fines shall be 3paid to the Department by certified check or money order 4within 30 calendar days of the notification. If, after the 5expiration of 30 days from the date of the notification, the 6person has failed to submit the necessary remittance, the 7Department shall automatically terminate the license or 8certificate or deny the application, without hearing. If, 9after termination or denial, the person seeks a license or 10certificate, he or she shall apply to the Department for 11restoration or issuance of the license or certificate and pay 12all fees and fines due to the Department. The Department may 13establish a fee for the processing of an application for 14restoration of a license or certificate to pay all expenses of 15processing this application. The Secretary may waive the fines 16due under this Section in individual cases where the Secretary 17finds that the fines would be unreasonable or unnecessarily 18burdensome.19(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 20    Section 10. The Clinical Social Work and Social Work 21Practice Act is amended by changing Section 13 as follows: 22    (225 ILCS 20/13)  (from Ch. 111, par. 6363)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)24    Sec. 13. Fees.   HB1417- 3 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the fees for the 2administration and enforcement of this Act, including but not 3limited to fees for original licensure, renewal, and 4restoration, shall be set by rule. The fees shall not be 5refundable. The fee for original licensure as a social worker 6continuing education sponsor shall not exceed $250. The fee 7for original licensure as a social worker shall not exceed 8$50. The fee for original licensure as a clinical social 9worker shall not exceed $50. The fee for renewal of licensure 10as a social worker continuing education sponsor shall be 11calculated at a rate not to exceed $125 per year. The fee for 12renewal of licensure as a social worker shall be calculated at 13a rate not to exceed $25 per year. The fee for renewal of 14licensure as a clinical social worker shall not exceed $25 per 15year. The total fees required by the Department to enter a 16profession shall not exceed double the original license fee. 17    (b) Applicants for examination shall be required to pay, 18either to the Department or the designated testing service, a 19fee covering the cost of initial screening to determine 20eligibility and providing the examination. Failure to appear 21for the examination on the scheduled date at the time and place 22specified, after the applicant's application for examination 23has been received and acknowledged by the Department or the 24designated testing service, shall result in the forfeiture of 25the examination fee.26(Source: P.A. 90-150, eff. 12-30-97.)   HB1417- 4 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1    Section 15. The Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act is 2amended by changing Section 85 as follows: 3    (225 ILCS 30/85)  (from Ch. 111, par. 8401-85)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)5    Sec. 85. Fees. The Department shall provide by rule for a 6schedule of fees for the administration and enforcement of 7this Act, including, but not limited to, original licensure, 8registration, renewal, and restoration. The fees shall be 9nonrefundable. The fee for original licensure as a dietitian 10nutritionist shall not exceed $50. The fee for renewal of 11licensure as a dietitian nutritionist shall be calculated at a 12rate not to exceed $25 per year. The total fees required by the 13Department to enter the profession shall not exceed double the 14original license fee. 15    All fees, fines, and penalties collected under this Act 16shall be deposited into the General Professions Dedicated Fund 17and shall be appropriated to the Department for the ordinary 18and contingent expenses of the Department in the 19administration of this Act.20(Source: P.A. 97-1141, eff. 12-28-12.) 21    Section 20. The Massage Therapy Practicing Act is amended 22by changing Section 80 as follows:   HB1417- 5 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1    (225 ILCS 57/80)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)3    Sec. 80. Fees. The fee for original licensure as a massage 4therapist shall not exceed $100. The fee for renewal of 5licensure as a massage therapist shall be calculated at a rate 6not to exceed $50 per year. The total fees required by the 7Department to enter the profession shall not exceed double the 8original license fee. The fees assessed under this Act shall 9be set by rule.10(Source: P.A. 92-860, eff. 6-1-03.) 11    Section 25. The Illinois Occupational Therapy Practice Act 12is amended by changing Section 16 as follows: 13    (225 ILCS 75/16)  (from Ch. 111, par. 3716)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)15    Sec. 16. Fees; returned checks. The fees for the 16administration and enforcement of this Act, including, but not 17limited to, original certification, renewal, and restoration 18of a license issued under this Act, shall be set by rule. The 19fees shall be non-refundable. The fee for original licensure 20as an occupational therapist shall not exceed $40. The fee for 21renewal of licensure as an occupational therapist shall be 22calculated at a rate not to exceed $20 per year. The total fees 23required by the Department to enter the profession shall not 24exceed double the original license fee.   HB1417- 6 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1    Any person who delivers a check or other payment to the 2Department that is returned to the Department unpaid by the 3financial institution upon which it is drawn shall pay to the 4Department, in addition to the amount already owed to the 5Department, a fine of $50. The fines imposed by this Section 6are in addition to any other discipline provided under this 7Act for unlicensed practice or practice on a nonrenewed 8license. The Department shall notify the person that payment 9of fees and fines shall be paid to the Department by certified 10check or money order within 30 calendar days of the 11notification. If, after the expiration of 30 days from the 12date of the notification, the person has failed to submit the 13necessary remittance, the Department shall automatically 14terminate the license or certificate or deny the application, 15without hearing. If, after termination or denial, the person 16seeks a license or certificate, the person shall apply to the 17Department for restoration or issuance of the license or 18certificate and pay all fees and fines due to the Department. 19The Department may establish a fee for the processing of an 20application for restoration of a license or certificate to pay 21all expenses of processing this application. The Secretary may 22waive the fines due under this Section in individual cases 23where the Secretary finds that the fines would be unreasonable 24or unnecessarily burdensome.25(Source: P.A. 103-251, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB1417- 7 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1    Section 30. The Pharmacy Practice Act is amended by 2changing Section 27 as follows: 3    (225 ILCS 85/27)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4147)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)5    Sec. 27. Fees. 6    (a) The Department shall, by rule, provide for a schedule 7of fees to be paid for licenses and certificates. These fees 8shall be for the administration and enforcement of this Act, 9including without limitation original licensure and renewal 10and restoration of licensure. All fees are nonrefundable. The 11fee for original licensure as a pharmacy technician shall not 12exceed $40. The fee for renewal of licensure as a pharmacy 13technician shall be calculated at a rate not to exceed $20 per 14year. The total fees required by the Department to enter the 15profession shall not exceed double the original license fee. 16    (b) Applicants for any examination as a pharmacist shall 17be required to pay, either to the Department or to the 18designated testing service, a fee covering the cost of 19determining an applicant's eligibility and providing the 20examination. Failure to appear for the examination on the 21scheduled date, at the time and place specified, after the 22applicant's application for examination has been received and 23acknowledged by the Department or the designated testing 24service, shall result in the forfeiture of the examination 25fee.   HB1417- 8 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1    (c) Applicants for the preliminary diagnostic examination 2shall be required to pay, either to the Department or to the 3designated testing service, a fee covering the cost of 4determining an applicant's eligibility and providing the 5examination. Failure to appear for the examination on the 6scheduled date, at the time and place specified, after the 7application for examination has been received and acknowledged 8by the Department or the designated testing service, shall 9result in the forfeiture of the examination fee.10    (d) All fees, fines, or penalties received by the 11Department under this Act shall be deposited in the Illinois 12State Pharmacy Disciplinary Fund hereby created in the State 13Treasury and shall be used by the Department in the exercise of 14its powers and performance of its duties under this Act, 15including, but not limited to, the provision for evidence in 16pharmacy investigations. 17    Moneys in the Fund may be transferred to the Professions 18Indirect Cost Fund as authorized under Section 2105-300 of the 19Department of Professional Regulation Law (20 ILCS 202105/2105-300).21    The moneys deposited in the Illinois State Pharmacy 22Disciplinary Fund shall be invested to earn interest which 23shall accrue to the Fund.24    (e) From the money received for license renewal fees, $5 25from each pharmacist fee, and $2.50 from each pharmacy 26technician fee, shall be set aside within the Illinois State   HB1417- 9 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1Pharmacy Disciplinary Fund for the purpose of supporting a 2substance abuse program for pharmacists and pharmacy 3technicians. 4    (f) A pharmacy, manufacturer of controlled substances, or 5wholesale distributor of controlled substances that is 6licensed under this Act and owned and operated by the State is 7exempt from licensure, renewal, and other fees required under 8this Act.9    Pharmacists and pharmacy technicians working in facilities 10owned and operated by the State are not exempt from the payment 11of fees required by this Act and any rules adopted under this 12Act.13    Nothing in this subsection (f) shall be construed to 14prohibit the Department from imposing any fine or other 15penalty allowed under this Act.16(Source: P.A. 100-497, eff. 9-8-17.) 17    Section 35. The Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice 18Act of 2004 is amended by changing Section 14 as follows: 19    (225 ILCS 115/14)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7014)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)21    Sec. 14. Fees. The Department shall provide by rule for a 22schedule of fees for the administration and enforcement of 23this Act, including but not limited to original licensure, 24renewal, and restoration of a license issued under this Act.   HB1417- 10 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1The fees shall be nonrefundable. The fee for original 2licensure as a veterinary technician shall not exceed $50. The 3fee for renewal of licensure as a veterinary technician shall 4be calculated at a rate not to exceed $25 per year. The total 5fees required by the Department to enter the profession shall 6not exceed double the original license fee. 7    All fees, fines, and penalties collected under this Act 8shall be deposited into the General Professions Dedicated Fund 9and shall be appropriated to the Department for the ordinary 10and contingent expenses of the Department in the 11administration of this Act.12(Source: P.A. 98-339, eff. 12-31-13.) 13    Section 40. The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair 14Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985 is amended by 15changing Section 4-5 as follows: 16    (225 ILCS 410/4-5)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1704-5)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)18    Sec. 4-5. Fees; time limitations. 19    (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) below, the fees 20for the administration and enforcement of this Act, including 21but not limited to fees for original licensure, renewal, and 22restoration shall be set by the Department by rule. The fees 23shall not be refundable. The fee for original licensure as a 24barber, cosmetologist, esthetician, hair braider, or nail   HB1417- 11 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1technician shall not exceed $30. The fee for renewal of 2licensure as a barber, cosmetologist, esthetician, hair 3braider, or nail technician shall be calculated at a rate not 4to exceed $15 per year. The total fees required by the 5Department to enter a profession shall not exceed double the 6original license fee. 7    (b) Applicants for examination shall be required to pay, 8either to the Department or the designated testing service, a 9fee covering the cost of initial screening to determine 10eligibility and providing the examination. Failure to appear 11for the examination on the scheduled date at the time and place 12specified, after the applicant's application for examination 13has been received and acknowledged by the Department or the 14designated testing service, shall result in the forfeiture of 15the examination fee.16    (c) If an applicant fails to pass an examination for 17licensure under this Act within 3 years after filing his 18application, the application shall be denied. However, such 19applicant may thereafter make a new application for 20examination accompanied by the required fee.21    (d) An individual applying on the basis of endorsement or 22restoration of licensure has 3 years from the date of 23application to complete the application process. If the 24process has not been completed in 3 years, the application 25shall be denied, the fee forfeited. The applicant may reapply, 26but shall meet the requirements in effect at the time of   HB1417- 12 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1reapplication.2    (e) An applicant has one year from the date of 3notification of successful completion of the examination to 4apply to the Department for a license. If an applicant fails to 5apply within one year the applicant shall be required to take 6and pass the examination again.7(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 8    Section 45. The Private Detective, Private Alarm, Private 9Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004 is 10amended by changing Section 50-30 as follows: 11    (225 ILCS 447/50-30)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)13    Sec. 50-30. Fees; deposit of fees and fines. The 14Department shall by rule provide for fees for the 15administration and enforcement of this Act, and those fees are 16nonrefundable. The fee for original licensure as a private 17detective, alarm contractor, private security, fingerprint 18vender, or locksmith shall not exceed $150. The fee for 19renewal of licensure as a private detective, alarm contractor, 20private security, fingerprint vender, or locksmith shall not 21exceed $75. The total fees required by the Department to enter 22a profession shall not exceed double the original license fee. 23Applicants for examination shall be required to pay a fee to 24either the Department or the designated testing service to   HB1417- 13 -LRB104 07623 AAS 17667 b1cover the cost of providing the examination. If an applicant 2fails to appear for the examination on the scheduled date at 3the time and place specified by the Department or designated 4testing service, then the applicant's examination fee shall be 5forfeited. All of the fees and fines collected under this Act 6shall be deposited into the General Professions Dedicated Fund 7and be appropriated to the Department for the ordinary and 8contingent expenses of the Department in the administration 9and enforcement of this Act.10(Source: P.A. 96-1445, eff. 8-20-10.)